Hawaii statutes.
§353-11.5 Restricted access to correctional
facilities. (a) Except for the director and employees of the department
of public safety, members of the Hawaii paroling authority, and those persons
specified in section 353-29, no person shall enter or remain on the
grounds of any state correctional facility unless permission to so enter or
remain has been obtained from the administrator of the correctional facility,
the administrator's designated representatives, or the director.

(b) Signs shall be posted at reasonable
intervals along the boundary of correctional facilities, informing the public
of the restriction against access provided in subsection (a).

(c) Any person who violates subsection (a)
shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. [L 1987, c 34, §1 and c 338, §10; am L 1988,
c 141, §31; am L 1989, c 211, §8]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next